Tennessee, session 114, SB1768.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SB1768
011465
- 1 -

SECTION 1. The Secretary of State shall direct county election commissions to place
the following advisory ballot question on the ballot for the November general election in 2026:
Shall the State of Tennessee authorize a regulated medical cannabis program for
qualifying patients, with a portion of cannabis tax revenue dedicated to after-
school programs, mental health services, law enforcement training, and
community cannabis education?
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011465